Washington statutes.
RCW 10.31.030

Service—How—Warrant not in possession, procedure—Bail.

The officer making an arrest must inform the defendant that he or she acts under authority of a warrant, and must also show the warrant: PROVIDED, That if the officer does not have the warrant in his or her possession at the time of arrest he or she shall declare that the warrant does presently exist and will be shown to the defendant as soon as possible on arrival at the place of intended confinement: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That any officer making an arrest under this section shall, if the person arrested wishes to deposit bail, take such person directly and without delay before a judge or before an officer authorized to take the recognizance and justify and approve the bail, including the deposit of a sum of money equal to bail. Bail shall be the amount fixed by the warrant. Such judge or authorized officer shall hold bail for the legal authority within this state which issued such warrant if other than such arresting authority.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1029; 1970 ex.s. c 49 s 3; 1891 c 28 s 43; Code 1881 s 1030; 1873 p 229 s 210; 1854 p 114 s 74; RRS s 2083.]

NOTES:

Severability—1970 ex.s. c 49: See note following RCW 9.69.100.

Bail: Chapter 10.19 RCW.